Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.100

Reports to legislature—Minutes.

The committee shall have the power to make reports to the legislature. The committee shall keep complete minutes of its meetings.

[ 1987 c 505 s 46; 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 10.]